New Jersey, session 221, A1219.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or any rule, regulation, or order adopted pursuant thereto, to the contrary, the owner of a commercial farm shall be eligible to apply for, and receive, any applicable incentives made available by the Board of Public Utilities through the New Jersey Clean Energy Program with funding provided by the societal benefits charge that is imposed pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60). b.  The Board of Public Utilities, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, shall establish a program to encourage or assist the owners of commercial farms to conduct energy audits to identify the current energy use of buildings and equipment and identify energy conservation measures that can be implemented in order to realize and maximize energy savings and energy efficiency. c.  The Board of Public Utilities shall publish on its Internet website any incentives and programs that are available to the owners of commercial farms pursuant to this section. d.  As used in this section: Commercial farm means the same as the term is defined at P.L.1983, c.31 (C.4:1C-3). Energy audit means an assessment of all energy-using systems to determine the consumption characteristics of a commercial farm which shall (1) identify the type, size, and rate of energy consumption of a commercial farm; (2) identify appropriate energy conservation maintenance and operating procedures; and (3) indicate the need, if any, for the acquisition and installation of energy conservation measures. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.